






























Choose Location
In order to serve you better, please select your location.  We have separate careers portals for the United States and Canada.



United States



Canada EnglishCanada Francais




 

 









A World of Opportunity
We're an international company with local attention to detail.  We're looking for employees that share our enthusiasm for innovation, collaboration, teamwork and results.



View Career Listings

 
 
 










View Career Listings

 
 
 










View Career Listings

 
 
 










View Career Listings

 
 
 
 






Experiences
We offer the opportunity to work in a high-energy environment where innovation and growth are valued.


Leadership
We're managed by experts in Finance, Operations, Marketing, Sales, IT, and HR. with a devotion to running our business effectively.


Benefits
We are committed to a diverse workforce as an equal opportunity employer. We offer all levels of competitive benefits and compensation.

 
 





Employee Testimonials
We pride ourselves in being a great place to work.  Don't take our word for it.  Take our employees'.

 







Judi B.
Sr Vice President, Business Transformation
 
 







Taylor R.
Packaging Engineer
 
 







Nick C.
Customer Service
 
 







Nazih M.
Plant Manager
 
 







Winston L.
National Broker Manager
 
 




 
 








Leading By Example

A MESSAGE FROM LANCE MITCHELL, CEO Reynolds Consumer Products
We are proud of our well-known and trusted brands, including Reynolds Wrap® foil, Hefty® trash bags, slider bags, and disposable tableware, and in 2014, we added Alcan® foil, Canada’s top foil brand. Our goal is to continue to earn your trust and offer new products and product improvements that make running a household easier. 
How we do it is just as important as the products we sell. Integrity is extremely important to us; we drive results through combining innovation and teamwork. A majority of our products are made in the U.S. and Canada, and the safety of our employees is our top priority. We put safety first, always. Our customer relationships are based on a long history of trust. We work to make not only our individual products successful; but provide insights to our retailers that help improve the product category.
We're looking for people that will help us reach our goals, including professionals in marketing, HR, IT, operations, logistics/supply chain, finance, and more. Please take a few minutes to read what some of our employees think about working here.









About Us

Two of the most trusted household brands, Reynolds® and Hefty®, joined together as Reynolds Consumer Products in 2010. While the establishment of this new company made it official, the truth is that Reynolds® and Hefty® products have been found side-by-side in the kitchens of American families for more than three generations.The creation of both the Reynolds® and Hefty® brands is the direct result of American ingenuity mixed with a bit of elbow grease. Reynolds Wrap® foil was invented after aluminum was no longer needed for military use; and became a new staple for American kitchens. Hefty® waste bags were first developed with excess material from an early plastics innovator, creating another household essential.

Read More



News



Box Tops for Education and Reynolds Consumer Products Host “Prep Your Pantry” Promotion!
John Cena Teams Up with Unlikely Co-Star—His Mom—in Triumphant Return as “Hefty Hefty Hefty!” Spokesperson in New Ads for Hefty® Ultra Strong™ Trash Bags
Dow Launches Grant Program to Launch Additional  Hefty® EnergyBag™ Programs for Converting  Non-Recycled Plastics to Energy
Hefty® Party Cups To Host Multi-City Flip Cup Tournament Encouraging Baseball Fans To Party Hefty®
New! Hefty Major League Baseball Party Cups
Reynolds Wrap Partners with Anthony Rizzo to Release Limited-Edition Rizzo Wrap 
How2Compost Packaging Label Standard Launches
Hefty Energy Bag: Omaha Program Converts Plastic Waste to Energy
Hefty Slider Bags Sponsors Teacherlists.Com To Make Getting School Supplies Simpler



Read More








Our Brands
Looking for more information on our Brands and products? Visit their individual sites for recipes, usage ideas, tips, promotions and coupons!













 












Products | Reynolds Kitchens















Skip to main content

 
















Newsletter Sign Up


Please enter your first name.

First Name *




Please enter your last name.

Last Name *




Please enter your email address.

Email *




Please accept the privacy policy.
Check the box to accept our Privacy Policy*

*Required










 
Social





































 
Products For All Your Kitchen Needs!
 
Reynolds® has a wide range of products to help you cook better meals in less time and with less mess. Click on the products below to learn more!







 Featured
 
Heat & Eat Containers







 
Foil
 
Reynolds Wrap® Aluminum Foil is available in a variety of widths and thicknesses to accommodate just about any task. It withstands high heat and extreme cold, making it perfect for everything from grilling to freezer storage.





 

 
Standard Aluminum Foil

 




 

 
Heavy Duty Aluminum Foil

 




 

 
Non-Stick Aluminum Foil

 




 

 
Grill Foil & Grill Bags

 




 

 
Foil Wrappers

 




 

 
Foil from 100% Recycled Aluminum

 




 

 
Pitmaster's Choice Aluminum Foil

 

 
Parchment Paper
 
Reynolds® Parchment Paper is a natural, high density paper with a non-stick coating. Bakers everywhere love parchment paper because it delivers better baking results.





 

 
Parchment Paper Rolls

 




 

 
Cookie Baking Sheets

 

 
Bakeware
 
Get creative and cook or bake something delicious in Reynold's Bakeware pans. Disposable aluminum pans available in different shapes and sizes for all your cooking needs.





 

 
Bakeware Pans With Lids & Carriers

 




 

 
Disposable Roasting Pans

 




 

 
Pasta & Casserole Pans

 




 

 
Fish & Bacon Pans

 




 

 
Parchment-Lined Bakeware

 




 

 
Cake & Pie Pans

 

 
More Products
 
There's a Reynolds® product that can help make any meal special.





 

 
Baking Cups

 




 

 
Wax Paper Sandwich Bags

 




 

 
Oven Bags

 




 

 
Heat & Eat Containers

 




 

 
Slow Cooker Liners

 




 

 
Pan Lining Paper

 




 

 
Freezer Paper

 




 

 
Cut-Rite Wax Paper

 








Loading



Back to top







The Reynolds and Reynolds Company
























Subscribe to Our Email


 










Reynolds
Solutions
Support
Careers
Dealer News
Company


































About Us

Reynolds Pride
In the Community
Scholarship Programs
Legacy and Timeline
Advisory Boards
What We Do





News and Events

News Releases
As Seen In
Industry Events
Road Show Schedule
Whitepapers and Reports









Marketing and Advertising

Customer Newsletters


Customer Success Videos
Customer Success Stories






Locations

Dayton, OH (Headquarters)
Houston, TX
College Station, TX
Celina, OH
International














































At a Glance


Provider of automotive retailing solutions for car dealers and automakers in the U.S., Canada, U.K., and Europe.
Founded in 1866 as a business forms printing company; began serving automobile dealers in 1927.
Headquartered in Dayton, Ohio, with more than 4,300 associates worldwide.
Recognized leader in customer satisfaction.


A Legacy of Product Innovation and Customer Service

									The Reynolds and Reynolds Company has a heritage of nearly 150 years of business operations - a heritage that 
									sets us apart as we build for the future.
									
									Reynolds was founded in 1866 as a forms printing company in Dayton, Ohio. We began serving the needs of automotive retailers in 
									1927 by providing standardized accounting forms for all franchised Chevrolet dealers. That one simple product made the 
									dealer's business more efficient and productive, and it made General Motors' task of analyzing sales and forecasting demand 
									much more consistent and effective. That spirit of innovation is the same spirit that has nurtured our growth over time . . . 
									from business forms in the 1920s . . . to batch processing systems in the 1960s and 70s . . . to today's sophisticated 
									dealership management systems and Web technologies.
									
									Today, Reynolds and Reynolds delivers the software, business forms and supplies, and professional services that support all 
									areas of automotive retailing for car dealers and automakers. Our solutions help improve the customer experience and help 
									make the dealer's business more efficient and profitable.
									
									Driven by our legacy of product innovation and customer service, our vision for the future is to help dealers transform their 
									business and the customer experience. That vision is anchored in the capability of the Reynolds dealership management 
									system and extends to every aspect of the dealer's retailing that affects the consumer experience, whether that's inside or 
									outside the four walls of the dealership. 
								


Quick Links

Latest News
Job Fairs
Industry Events
Customer Newsletters


























Copyright © 2017	The	Reynolds and Reynolds Company. All rights reserved.       Privacy Policy       Safe Harbor Policy       Legal Notices       Contact Us 

















  Reynolds Number  
           +                Text Only Site + Non-Flash Version +                Contact Glenn      




















      




As an object moves through the atmosphere, the gas molecules
of the atmosphere near the
object are disturbed and move around the object.
Aerodynamic
forces are generated between the gas and the object. The
magnitude of these forces depend on the shape of the object, the
speed of the object,
the mass
of the gas going by the object and on two other important properties
of the gas; the viscosity, or stickiness, of the gas and the
compressibility, or springiness, of the gas. To properly model
these effects, aerodynamicists use 
similarity parameters
which are
ratios
of these effects to other forces present in the
problem. If two experiments have the same values for the similarity
parameters, then the relative importance of the forces are being
correctly modeled. Representative values for the properties of
air 
are given on another page,
but the actual value of the parameter depends
on the
state of the gas
and on the
altitude.


Aerodynamic forces depend in a complex way on the 
viscosity
of the gas. 
As an object moves through a gas, the gas molecules stick to
the surface. This creates a layer of air near the surface, called a
boundary layer,
which, in effect, changes the shape of the
object. The flow of gas reacts to the edge of the boundary layer as if
it was the physical surface of the object. To make things more
confusing, the boundary layer may
separate
from the
body and create an effective shape much different from the physical
shape. And to make it even more confusing, the flow conditions in and
near the boundary layer are often unsteady (changing in time).
The boundary layer is very important in determining the
drag
of an object. To determine and predict these conditions,
aerodynamicists rely on 
 wind tunnel
testing and very sophisticated computer analysis.


The important similarity parameter for viscosity is the
Reynolds number. The Reynolds number expresses the ratio of
inertial (resistant to change or motion) forces to viscous
(heavy and gluey) forces. From a detailed
analysis of the
momentum conservation equation,
the inertial forces are characterized by the product of the
density r times the velocity V times the
gradient of the velocity  dV/dx. The viscous forces
are characterized by the dynamic viscosity coefficient mu times
the second gradient of the velocity  d^2V/dx^2. The
Reynolds number Re then becomes:



Re = (r * V * dV/dx) / (mu * d^2V/dx^2)



The gradient of the velocity is proportional to the velocity
divided by a length scale L. Similarly, the second derivative
of the velocity is proportional to the velocity divided by the square
of the length scale. Then:



Re = (r * V * V/L) / (mu * V / L^2)


Re = (r * V * L) / mu



The Reynolds number is a dimensionless number. High values of the parameter
(on the order of 10 million) indicate that viscous forces are small and the
flow is essentially inviscid. The
Euler equations
can then be used to model the flow. Low values of the parameter
(on the order of 1 hundred) indicate that viscous forces must be considered.


The Reynolds number can be further simplified if we use the
kinematic viscosity nu that is euqal to
the dynamic viscosity divided by the density:



nu = mu / r


Re =  V * L / nu



Here's a Java program to calculate the coefficient of viscosity
and the Reynolds number
for different altitude, length, and speed.





This page shows an interactive Java applet which calculates the viscosity coefficient
and the Reynolds number for an input velocity, length, and altitude.




To change input values, click on the input box (black on white),
backspace over the input value, type in your new value, and
hit the Enter key on the keyboard (this sends your new value to the program).
You will see the output boxes (yellow on black)
change value. You can use either Imperial or Metric units and you can input either the Mach number
or the speed by using the menu buttons. Just click on the menu button and click
on your
selection.
The non-dimensional Mach number and Reynolds number are displayed in
white on blue boxes.
If you are an experienced user of this calculator, you can use a
sleek version
of the program which loads faster on your computer and does not include these instructions.
You can also download your own copy of the program to run off-line by clicking on this button: 



 The Similarity Parameter Calculator was modified in May, 2009, by Anthony Vila,
a student at Vanderbilt University,  
during a summer intern session at NASA Glenn.


For some problems we can divide the Reynolds by the length scale to obtain the
Reynolds number per foot Ref. This is given by:



Ref =  V / nu



The Reynolds number per foot (or per meter) is obviously 
not a non-dimensional number like the Reynolds number.
You can determine the Reynolds number per foot using the calculator
by specifycing the length scale to be 1 foot.


Activities:


Guided Tours




Navigation .. 






Beginner's Guide Home Page

          
    
                  


+ Inspector General Hotline
+ Equal Employment Opportunity Data Posted Pursuant to the No Fear Act
+ Budgets, Strategic Plans and Accountability Reports
+ Freedom of Information Act
+ The President's Management Agenda
+ NASA Privacy Statement, Disclaimer,
 and Accessibility Certification
 
   
 Editor: Tom                    Benson                   NASA Official: Tom                    Benson                   Last Updated:   Jun 12 2014


+                    Contact Glenn          

Glenn Reynolds                                                                                                           - Thomasville                                       , PA         - Company Information









 



























Products
Resources
My Account












Talk to a D&B Advisor 
1-800-280-0780 




Business Directory



PA



Thomasville



General Farms, Primarily Crop



General Farms, Primarily Crop



                            Glenn Reynolds
                                    



 





















G 


Glenn Reynolds                                                                                                          
CLAIM THIS BUSINESS



5195 ADMIRE RD THOMASVILLE, PA 17364
Get Directions



(717) 292-1887
 





Business Info



 Founded 1952
 Incorporated 
 Annual Revenue $57,915.00
 Employee Count 1
 Industries General Farms, Primarily Crop
 Contacts Glenn Reynolds                                                                                                          







Contact Business







Your Email Address

Subject:


Message


Send Message





Company Summary


Glenn Reynolds                                                                                                           is located at 5195 Admire Rd in Thomasville and has been in the business of General Farms, Primarily Crop since 1952. 









VERIFIED Status:
UNVERIFIED



Address:
UNVERIFIED





LAST VERIFIED:

                                    --
                                



Phone:

                                    UNVERIFIED
                                





Payment Method:
UNVERIFIED


view full report





Similar Businesses Nearby


                                        Our similar businesses nearby shows similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Competitive Landscape


                                        Our competitive landscape shows how this business compares to similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Payments Accepted

NO DATA



Hours



                                        Sunday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Monday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Tuesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Wednesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Thursday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Friday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Saturday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        







G

VIEW ADDITIONAL DATA                        
Select from over 115 networks below to view available data about this business. If this data is unavailable or inaccurate and you own or represent this business, click here for more information on how you may be able to correct it. 







Credibility Review





Google





Facebook.com





Yellowbook.com





Bing.com





Yellowpages.com





MerchantCircle





Tele Atlas (TomTom)





Twitter.com





AOL





MapQuest





Yahoo Local





Apple/Siri





Groupon





Hotfrog.com





Comcast.net Search





ReachLocal





Admedia





Dealsplus





Shoptopia.com





Alteryx





Dogtime Media





KSL.com





Sirtune





AmericanTowns.com





Driverside





Kudzu.com





SpecialsAgent.com





Answers.com





eGood





LawInfo.com





spotlikes.com





anywho.com





eGumball





Likeness.com





Spotzot





eServiceLog





MapMyRun





TechnoCom





apartmentguide.com





ezlocal.com





EZToUse.com





Teleroute





AroundMe.com





metropolist.com





Therapists.com





Atlanta NewHomes





FindLaw.com





Time Out New York





Avantar





FindTheBest.com





mojopages.com





B2B Yellowpages





Fivestar Software





MyCityWay.com





TripAdvisor





bckyrd.com





GiftCards.com





MyCoupons.com





beachcalifornia.com





GoLocal247.com





mymove.com





UpMeSocial.com





Belo





GoodInfo





News-Gazette





Nokia





usdirectory.com





Cars.com





Nomao





Centzy.com





hibu





Openlist.com





ChaCha Search





Homeplate.com





OwnLocal.com





VisiKard





challama.com





Homestore





patch.com





Voltari





CityBot





Pelopidas





Vouchd





ClassifiedAds





Hostway





PlaceIQ





WalkScore.com





CloudMade





Hoodoyou





PlanetDiscover.com





WeddingWire.com





PowerProfiles





Where Inc.





Contractors.com





iGoLocal.com





Radiate Media





Wikiocity





CouponMap





Indeed.com





Wimgo.com





CrowdSpot





Innova Electronics





Intellistrand





realtor.com





DataSphere





InTheMO.com





Reply.com





Yellowbot.com





JiWire





Rocket Fuel





YellowPageCity.com





DMV.org





Justclicklocal.com





Dirxion





Keen.com





Zidster.com












Photos














































Business Credit Report
Receive a one-time comprehensive credit report on this company.
get full credit report


Facebook








Twitter








Yelp






































Call 1.800.280.0780 to speak with a D&B Advisor Today!







Customer Resources
Products
Education Center
Business Articles & Insights
Glossary
Contact Us
Customer Support
Communication Preferences
Search for D&B D-U-N-S




Our Company
About Us
Company History
Business Credit History
Careers
Press Releases
News
Success Stories
Hoovers




Our Network
Partners
Affiliates
Blog
Access to Capital
Entrepreneurial Initiative
D&B International
SupplierEdge




Site Links
Business Directory
Site Map
PIPEDA
Privacy Policy
Website Terms of Service
Product License Agreement







© Dun & Bradstreet, Inc. 2017. All rights reserved.

















Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft












Instapundit  



















 




































My Account | Sign Out
 













Amazon
Shop Amazon
photos
Contact
RSS
PDA
Other Writings
Advertising
PJ Media





 







July 28, 2017



AT AMAZON, fresh New Releases, updated hourly.
Plus, today’s new Kindle Daily Deals.
And shop the Digital Deals of the Day.

 
    Posted at 9:00 am by Helen Smith
 
   





WHY THE AYATOLLAHS PLAY SPEEDBOAT BLUFF IN THE PERSIAN GULF: It’s an act of war in the regime’s long war on America. And on July 25 we witnessed the latest speedboat bluff battle in that war when a speedboat manned by Islamic Revolutionary Guard Corps (IRGC) personnel approached American vessels.
The USS Thunderbolt responded and went to General Quarters—immediate combat readiness on the warship, its crew members at battle stations with ammo on hand. The Thunderbolt was screening the AEGIS cruiser USS Vella Gulf, a USN capital warship carrying anti-ballistic missiles (ABMs) capable of intercepting North Korean and Iranian intermediate range ballistic missiles (IRBMs). With fanatics at the helm an IRGC boat could be a suicide boat bomb.
Note the Iranians continue to develop long-range ballistic missiles. Obama’s Iran deal didn’t stop that program. It really didn’t stop the ayatollahs’ quest for nukes. And it’s biggest failure is it doesn’t penalize bad behavior, like speedboat bluff to disrupt U.S. naval formations. 

 
    Posted at 8:58 am by Austin Bay
 
   





A BLUEPRINT FOR NEW SANCTIONS ON NORTH KOREA: From the Center for a New American Security.
Despite the perception that North Korea has long been the most sanctioned country on earth, the reality is that until recently, those sanctions were not very comprehensive. Though the U.N. Security Council had passed four sanctions resolutions between 2005 and 2015, none of them meaningfully tightened the economic screws on North Korea. Without this broad economic force, they lacked the leverage to compel policy change or effective nuclear diplomacy. Instead, they were narrowly targeted at specific individuals and companies involved in North Korea’s nuclear program and served as more of a messaging tool, with relatively limited financial consequences for North Korea and its regime elites.
There is room to increase the economic and political pressure on North Korea’s economy using sanctions and “military leverage”:
Aggressively doing so plus targeting the international companies, including many based in China, that still do business with North Korea could begin to curb its continued ability to generate hard currency from exports and its continued access to the international financial system. This additional pressure could limit the country’s ability to generate the funds it needs for its nuclear program. Just as important, it would restrict Kim’s ability to handle any ensuing economic instability. This would build critical leverage for the United States in future diplomatic negotiations with North Korea over its nuclear program.
The study says “North Korea’s international trading relationships constitute a target-rich environment.” For example, sanction “any bank or company involved in purchases of North Korean exports – including coal, minerals, textiles, and other products” and “craft sanctions targeting insurance companies that underwrite cargoes to and from North Korea.” The best model for this “tougher approach” with sanctions was the sanctions regiment “that the United States imposed on Iran before the JCPOA was concluded in 2015.” That’s the bad Iran deal Obama slapped together. 
RELATED: Some examples of tough sanctions and military leverage.

 
    Posted at 8:52 am by Austin Bay
 
   



 






ISRAEL EVALUATES ITS READINESS FOR WAR: Hamas and Hezbollah are the daily challenges, but Iran is the big threat. By the way, Iran still wants nukes.
The Iranian regime has not given up its strategic objective of obtaining nuclear weapons. The sunset clauses on the nuclear deal will lift key restrictions over the next eight to thirteen years. Assuming the hard-line Shiite ideological-religious camp and the Islamic Revolutionary Guards Corps (IRGC) continue to control Iran’s foreign and military policies, the Islamic Republic will be able restart its nuclear program at the end of the sunset clauses (if it does not cheat and breach the agreement beforehand).
Iran could begin enriching uranium again (using improved techniques it is currently researching) to bring it to nuclear breakout, and could try to reach that point at a time of its choosing. Its missile program is already developing. This means Israel could find itself in a state-to-state conflict in the not too distant future. 
Additionally, Arab Sunni states threatened by Iran have launched civil nuclear programs of their own. These could turn out to be the initial stages of military nuclear programs, designed to counter Iran’s nuclear shadow.
More evidence that Obama’s Iran deal was a very bad deal.

 
    Posted at 8:34 am by Austin Bay
 
   





K.C. JOHNSON & STUART TAYLOR:  Betsy DeVos is right: In college sexual assault cases, due process matters.
A system in which a wrongly accused student’s best chance of vindication comes after his college improperly brands him a rapist, and only if he can afford an expensive and protracted lawsuit, is a travesty of justice. Moreover, despite some suggestions by defenders of Obama policies that colleges have responded to these court decisions by creating fairer procedures for accused students, the reverse has been far more typical. Amidst legal challenges, schools including Brown and Swarthmore adjusted their policies to make it harder for innocent students to win vindication, by scaling back the rights promised to accused students. Reflecting this mindset, the National Association of College and University Attorneys published a May 2016 research note urging colleges and universities to “promptly destroy” documents such as “e-mails … staff notes, … notes of hearing participants during a disciplinary hearing, drafts of hearing outcome reports, and other such working papers,” all of which “might actually prove very useful to a plaintiff’s lawyer” in a subsequent lawsuit.
Why does Senator Kirsten Gillibrand (D-NY) hate college men?

 
    Posted at 8:33 am by Glenn Reynolds
 
   





TIME TO PRIMARY SOME FOLKS:  Republicans repeal and replace the Tea Party.
Even when Republicans control the White House and both houses of Congress, liberalism remains the default ideology of the federal government.
A Republican Senate could not muster even 50 votes for the full repeal of Obamacare’s taxes and spending. Six Republican senators who had voted for repeal in 2015, when the party was merely pretending it was possible, flipped on Wednesday rather than deliver.
Five of the six represent states President Trump won in November. The sixth hails from a state Trump lost by less than 3 points.
An argument can be made that repealing these parts of Obamacare while leaving its regulatory structure largely in place is a bad idea. But we are discussing a law that Republicans spent seven years campaigning against. Every GOP senator except one either voted for repeal in the past or campaigned on it in a recent election cycle. Their leader was said to have a “secret plan” to repeal Obamacare “root and branch.”
There was ample time for a contingency plan or even a better approach to replacing the healthcare law.
No amount of time ever seems to be enough. Not 1 inch of ground gained by liberalism is ever ceded without a fight. Republicans can campaign against those gains. They can now tweet about them. But when it comes to action, Republicans can seldom do more than nibble around the edges. The slightest retrenchment of a healthcare law that did not even exist a decade ago is portrayed as a mass casualty event.
Repeal and replace some members.

 
    Posted at 8:30 am by Glenn Reynolds
 
   





TYPICAL:  Watch: Senators gasp as John McCain votes against Obamacare repeal.

 
    Posted at 8:23 am by Glenn Reynolds
 
   





AT AMAZON,  70% off or more on Camping Folding Knives.

 
    Posted at 8:02 am by Helen Smith
 
   



 






WELL, TO BE FAIR, THERE’S A LOT MORE TO PROBE:  House Panel Turns Search for Trump Documents Into Clinton Probe.

 
    Posted at 8:00 am by Glenn Reynolds
 
   





MARK PULLIAM:  A Demagogic Bully:  The Southern Poverty Law Center demonizes respectable political opponents as “hate groups”—and keeps its coffers bulging.  “Ironically, the SPLC not only overlooks most of the real hate groups in operation today, along with overtly race-based organizations, such as the pro-Latino National Council of La Raza and MEChA, but also labels moderates with whom it disagrees ‘extremists’ if they deviate from its rigid political agenda, which embraces open borders, LGBT rights, and other left-wing totems. The SPLC has branded Somali-born reformer Ayaan Hirsi Ali an “anti-Muslin extremist” for her opposition to female genital mutilation and other oppressive Islamic practices, and designated the respected Family Research Council as a ‘hate group’ for its opposition to same-sex marriage. Likewise, the organization deems mainstream immigration-reform advocates such as the Center for Immigration Studies (CIS) and Federation for American Immigration Reform (FAIR) as hate groups. British Muslim activist Maajid Nawaz—regarded by most observers as a human rights leader—is suing the SPLC for listing him as an extremist.”

 
    Posted at 7:40 am by Glenn Reynolds
 
   





WINNING FRIENDS AND INFLUENCING PEOPLE:  Murkowski’s committee postponed confirmation vote for Trump nominees.
The committee led by Sen. Lisa Murkowski postponed a vote on six Trump administration nominees on Wednesday, the same day a Cabinet secretary allegedly threatened retribution against the Alaska Republican over her healthcare vote. . . .
Murkowski and other GOP senators have repeatedly criticized Democrats for trying to delay confirmations of Trump administration officials.
The six nominees who would have gotten a vote Thursday morning are Brenda Burman to be commissioner of reclamation at Interior; Susan Combs to be assistant secretary of the Interior for policy, management and budget; Doug Domenech to be assistant secretary of the Interior for insular affairs; Paul Dabbar to be undersecretary for science of the Department of Energy (DOE); David Jonas to be general counsel of the DOE; and Mark Wesley Menezes to be undersecretary of the DOE.
The group had a relatively easy confirmation hearing last week. Each nominee also needs a vote in the full Senate before being sworn in.
Both Zinke and Energy Secretary Rick Perry are the only Senate-confirmed officials at their agencies, more than six months after President Trump’s inauguration.
I’m not a fan of Murkowski’s.

 
    Posted at 7:30 am by Glenn Reynolds
 
   





TRUST YOUR LEADERS:  Swedish Government In Crisis As Almost Everyone’s Personal Data Is Leaked.
Sweden is having a bad decade.  But the next decade will probably be worse.

 
    Posted at 7:18 am by Glenn Reynolds
 
   





JUSTICE:  College Students Falsely Accused Of Sexual Assault Have A Good Couple of Weeks.

 
    Posted at 7:16 am by Glenn Reynolds
 
   





DIVERSITY PROBLEM:  My law school is as ideologically left as the average lawprof who teaches Feminist Legal Theory.

 
    Posted at 7:05 am by Glenn Reynolds
 
   



 






REMEMBER “LOVE TRUMPS HATE?”  YEAH, ME NEITHER.  Trump-supporting Drag Queen Faces Wrath of LGBT Community.

 
    Posted at 7:00 am by Glenn Reynolds
 
   





EDWARD LUTTWAK:  Could The Trump Dynasty Last 16 Years?

In Washington DC, post-electoral stress disorder has generated a hysteria still amply manifest after eight months: the “Russian candidate” impeachment campaign implies that any contact with any Russian by anyone with any connection to Donald Trump was ipso facto treasonous. The quality press is doing its valiant best to pursue this story, but it is a bit much to claim “collusion” – a secret conspiracy – given that, during the election campaign, Trump very publicly called on the Russians to hack and leak Hillary Clinton’s missing emails. And it did not seem especially surprising when the latest target, Donald Trump Jr, promptly released all his emails to and from the Russians to confirm that he did indeed try to help his dad by finding dirt on the other guy. As for the other impeachment track underway, triggered by the ex-FBI director James Comey’s accusation of attempted obstruction of justice, Comey’s failure to accuse Trump until he was himself fired will make it easier for the Republicans who control the House to dismiss an otherwise plausible accusation as a naive error. . . .
But another reason is that the major cause of last November’s electoral outcome has remained mostly unexplored, even un­discovered. That is not due to intellectual laziness, but rather reflects the refusal of almost all commentators to contend with the political economy that determined the outcome of the election. Long-term processes of income redistribution from working people to everyone else, non-working welfare recipients as well as the very rich, had been evident for at least two decades. . . .
In the dramatic crescendo of the 2016 elections that gave Trump to the United States and the world, very possibly for sixteen years (the President’s re-election committee is already hard at work, while his daughter Ivanka Trump is duly apprenticed in the White House that, according to my sources, she means to occupy as America’s first female President), none of the countless campaign reporters and commentators is on record as having noticed the car “affordability” statistics distributed in June 2016 via www.thecarconnection.com. Derived from very reliable Federal Reserve data, they depicted the awful predicament of almost half of all American households. Had journalists studied the numbers and pondered even briefly their implications, they could have determined a priori that only two candidates could win the Presidential election – Sanders and Trump – because none of the others even recognized that there was problem if median American households had been impoverished to the point that they could no longer afford a new car. . . .  The Clinton crowd even more than the candidate herself blamed the lethargy of the TV-watching, beer-drinking, gun-owning, church-going, and cigarette-smoking “deplorables”, who unaccountably failed to avail themselves of the wonderful opportunity to leave boring assembly-line jobs or downright dangerous coal-face or oil drilling jobs to become fashion designers, foreign-exchange traders, software engineers, or even political campaign operatives.
Read the whole thing.

 
    Posted at 6:06 am by Glenn Reynolds
 
   




July 27, 2017



TWITTER SUSPENDS RAHEEM KASSAM days after he announces his new book, No Go Zones: How Sharia Law Is Coming to a Neighborhood Near You.
Weird how people are leaving Twitter and its stock price keeps falling. What’s going on with that?

 
    Posted at 11:31 pm by Glenn Reynolds
 
   





EVERYTHING’S A RACKET NOWADAYS:  The ‘Smoking Gun’ Emails That Show Advocates, Academics Coordinated To Boost $15 Minimum Wage.

 
    Posted at 11:15 pm by Glenn Reynolds
 
   





AT AMAZON, Introducing Education Supplies.
Plus, Shop Amazon – Used Textbooks – Save up to 90%.

 
    Posted at 11:00 pm by Helen Smith
 
   





TO BE FAIR, THERE’S LOTS OF EMBARRRASSMENT TO GO AROUND:  The most embarrassing thing about this CBS News puff piece isn’t that it proclaims that “Hillary Clinton lets her ‘guard down'” based on nothing more than that… … the Introduction to her new memoir makes the statement “Now I’m letting my guard down.”

 
    Posted at 10:50 pm by Glenn Reynolds
 
   





TRIAL DATE SET IN KIM JONG NAM ASSASSINATION: The two women accused of murdering North Korean dictator Kim Jong Un’s half brother will come to trial on October 2.
Stay tuned.

 
    Posted at 10:45 pm by Austin Bay
 
   





LETTER TO ROD ROSENSTEIN FROM HOUSE JUDICIARY REQUESTING A SECOND SPECIAL COUNSEL.

 
    Posted at 10:34 pm by Glenn Reynolds
 
   





MICK JAGGER GETS POLITICAL: The tune is England Lost. It features British rapper Skepta. It’s about discontent.
JAGGER:
“So am I politically optimistic? … No.”
The USA Today webpage with the article has music videos of England Lost and Gotta Get A Grip. Both by Mick Jagger.

 
    Posted at 10:15 pm by Austin Bay
 
   





GOOD QUESTION:  Why Was Wife of DWS’s Swindler Staffer Allowed to Leave the Country?
In the Morning Jolt, Jim nicely outlines the increasingly bizarre story of a family of Pakistani information technologists who became House staffers under the auspices of Representative Debbie Wasserman Shultz (DWS) of Florida, the former head of the Democratic National Committee and a Clinton partisan. Over the years, family members were paid millions of dollars, and there are allegations of fraud, property theft, and potential swiping of information to which they had access on the House IT network. 
The entire story merits attention and follow-up, working backwards from yesterday’s arrest of Imran Awan, DWS’s top IT staffer, whom she has gone to great lengths to protect despite the swirling investigation. Awan was bagged trying to flee to Lahore, Pakistan. According to the complaint filed in federal court in support of his arrest, Awan wired $283,000 in January from the Congressional Federal Credit Union to Faisalabad, Pakistan. He has been charged with bank fraud in a scheme involving mortgages on various properties owned by the Awan family. 
The FBI has also reportedly searched his home, seizing computer hard drives that had been smashed to pieces. For now, I want to focus on a narrow part of the story. In early March, as Jim details, Imran’s wife, Hina Alvi, suddenly left the country for Lahore, by way of Doha, Qatar. Notwithstanding the return flight she booked for a date in September 2017, the FBI believes that she actually has no intention to return to the U.S. She had abruptly pulled the couple’s three daughters out of school without alerting the school’s staff, and brought them with her — along with lots of luggage and household goods — to Pakistan. 
Hina had also been on the House payroll.
This whole story stinks.

 
    Posted at 10:05 pm by Glenn Reynolds
 
   





COLOR ME UNSURPRISED:  The Hill:  Intelligence chairman accuses Obama aides of hundreds of unmasking requests.

 
    Posted at 10:00 pm by Glenn Reynolds
 
   





NEXT STOP, YIKYAKTOWN:  Twitter’s Stock Plummets On Report It Is Losing Money And Losing Users In The U.S.

 
    Posted at 9:47 pm by Glenn Reynolds
 
   





QUESTION ASKED. Rep. Steve King: What Happened to Money Debbie Wasserman Schultz’s IT Consultant Wired to Pakistan?

 
    Posted at 9:14 pm by Ed Driscoll
 
   





YOU DON’T HAVE TO BE STONED TO SUPPORT GAVIN NEWSOM, BUT IT HELPS:  The cannabis candidate: Gavin Newsom dominates donations from a growing industry aiming for influence.

 
    Posted at 9:07 pm by Glenn Reynolds
 
   





WISH YOU WEREN’T HERE. Roger Waters’ Jewish Problem Catches Eye of Award-Winning Filmmaker:
“I started traveling, meeting with different leaders throughout Europe. I didn’t know how bad the problem is with contemporary anti-Semitism there,” [award-winning filmmaker and New York Times bestselling author Ian Halperin] told the Observer. “There are less than 2 million Jews left in Europe, which is very alarming—a place where Jews have long been an integral part of society and whose valuable contributions to the culture are immeasurable.”
“During my research,” Halperin continued, “I came upon Roger Waters, and I couldn’t believe he was singling out Israel when there are so many truly egregious violators of human rights in the world. Why is he going after Israel? So, I began asking people what this guy has against Israel. To me, an attack on Israel is an attack against the Jewish people.”
Halperin met with psychologists who work with Holocaust survivors and their families. He described the effect of Waters’ floating pig bearing the Star of David as “unforgiveable” for survivors, comparing it to a scene in his film where a three-year-old Palestinian girl is “brainwashed” into believing Jews are pigs.
In preparation for the documentary, Halperin interviewed leaders in the South African anti-apartheid struggle. They found Waters’ comparison to Israel offensive and demeaning to their people’s suffering.
Waters is a self-admitted John Lennon worshiper, and during the 1970s, increasingly attempted to introduce the brutally direct and introspective lyric style of Plastic Ono Band, Lennon’s first proper solo album, into the swirling art rock atmosphere of Pink Floyd’s sound. Just as Lennon fixated upon the early death of his mother to write some of his most personal material in the last years of the Beatles and the start of his solo career, the death of Waters’ father at Anzio when Waters was five months old became Waters’ obsession during The Wall and The Final Cut, Waters’ last two albums with the Floyd.
In 1942’s Casablanca, Humphrey Bogart’s character famously tells Ingrid Bergman’s Ilsa to flee the Nazis with Resistance leader Victor Laszlo, because in the midst of WWII, “the problems of three little people don’t amount to a hill of beans in this crazy world.”
It was four decades between that film and the movie version of The Wall, the album that Time famously dubbed “the libretto for Me-Decade narcissism.” So much so that, based on the film version of the album, it seems as if Waters would much prefer to have his father back, even if it meant England not entering WWII. Given the implications of that, no wonder Waters is railing so strongly against Israel. Or as Mark Steyn once wrote, “The old joke — that the Germans will never forgive the Jews for Auschwitz — gets truer every week.”

 
    Posted at 8:44 pm by Ed Driscoll
 
   





OH, THAT CULTURE OF NARCISSISM. Study: A culture of “competitive victimhood” makes people less, not more, empathetic to others.
(Classical reference in headline.)

 
    Posted at 8:34 pm by Ed Driscoll
 
   





UNEXPECTEDLY. Twitter Fails to Grow Its Audience, Again: Monthly active users in the U.S. fell, as did ad revenue.
Back in February, the Wall Street Journal reported that “Twitter Posts 10th Straight Quarter of Lower Revenue.”
But these things tend to happen when you go full-on SJW, and begin to ban controversial users – you know, the ones who generate clicks and links by being provocative. Or as Steve wrote a month ago, “I miss the old Twitter, too, before the company discouraged honest give-and-take by going Full SJW.”
(Via Small Dead Animals, which links to the above Bloomberg article under the headline “#TweetsUp.”)
Heh, indeed.™

 
    Posted at 8:14 pm by Ed Driscoll
 
   





STEP ONE:  STOP READING THE NEW YORK TIMES. How to Improve Resilience in Midlife. 

 
    Posted at 8:05 pm by Glenn Reynolds
 
   





IRAN HAS BECOME EMBOLDENED DESPITE OBAMA’S SO-CALLED NUCLEAR AGREEMENT: That’s what President Trump said this past Tuesday in Youngstown, Ohio, and he’s right.
Iran’s violent troublemaking is both old news and breaking news.
By one count, in 1996 the regime was involved in at least 17 international conflicts, most of them in the Middle East or Central Asia, but its malign tentacles touched even South America. Today Tehran’s tentacles engage well over two dozen conflicts, and likely more since several conflicts in Africa and Asia are wars within wars within wars. It’s no matter, creating violent trouble is Tehran’s business. That’s the regime’s past and present.
Next time Obama’s rotten Joint Comprehensive Plan of Action comes up for certification –that should be in October– Washington needs to tell Tehran that the very bad deal is simply too flawed to work.

 
    Posted at 6:57 pm by Austin Bay
 
   





AT AMAZON, 5.11 Tactical Taclite Pro Pants.  

 
    Posted at 6:04 pm by Helen Smith
 
   





OH, GOODY:  Case of Zika Virus, Likely Spread by Mosquito, Is Reported in Texas. 

 
    Posted at 6:03 pm by Glenn Reynolds
 
   





I QUESTION THE PREMISE OF THIS CNN HEADLINE: Democrats say they’re ready for a culture war as Trump bans transgender people from military service.
Guys (and the 70 other optional genders on Facebook) – you are the culture war. And have been for over a century now. Or as Fred Siegel wrote in his 2014 book, The Revolt Against the Masses: How Liberalism Has Undermined the Middle Class, “The best short credo of liberalism came from the pen of the once canonical left-wing literary historian Vernon Parrington in the late 1920s. ‘Rid society of the dictatorship of the middle class,’ Parrington insisted, referring to both democracy and capitalism, ‘and the artist and the scientist will erect in America a civilization that may become, what civilization was in earlier days, a thing to be respected.’”
So how has that been working out for all concerned?

 
    Posted at 5:51 pm by Ed Driscoll
 
   





HE’S NOT CULTURALLY APPROPRIATING FROM MARK RIPPETOE, TO JUDGE FROM THIS PICTURE:  ‘Privileged’ Justin Trudeau accused of colonialist attitude over boxing match.

 
    Posted at 5:49 pm by Glenn Reynolds
 
   





THE ANSWER IS, “OF COURSE!”  John Ringo emails:  “I’m doing a crowdfund video with some former vets (professionals in the biz) in the Black Tide Rising universe. (Under a Graveyard Sky, etc.)  Any chance for a bump on the link?”
The link is here.

 
    Posted at 5:46 pm by Glenn Reynolds
 
   





WELL, YES, THE FBI’S GENERAL COUNSEL IS A “TOP FBI LAWYER:”  A top FBI lawyer is under an investigation for allegedly leaking classified information.

 
    Posted at 5:33 pm by Glenn Reynolds
 
   





CONRAD BLACK:  Why Trump Must Win.  “Everyone who follows American affairs should understand that the country is now in what amounts to a second, but non-violent civil war. . . .  Most have never seen such an immediate and no holds-barred battle between the Washington power structure and a new administration, because there has never been one.”

 
    Posted at 5:05 pm by Glenn Reynolds
 
   





CHANGE:  “The Republican-led House has voted to make a $1.6 billion down payment for President Donald Trump’s long-promised wall along the U.S.-Mexico border.”

 
    Posted at 4:05 pm by Glenn Reynolds
 
   





BECAUSE PEOPLE ARE STUPID:  Winnipeg Man Has Vanity Plate Referencing Star Trek Recalled Over Complaints Of How Racist It Is.  Well, SJW people are stupid, anyway.

 
    Posted at 4:00 pm by Glenn Reynolds
 
   





AT AMAZON, deals galore at the Amazon Baby Store.
Plus, save in Industrial and Scientific

 
    Posted at 3:00 pm by Glenn Reynolds
 
   





THE VERY VERY BAD IRAN DEAL:
In a speech in April 2016, Secretary of Defense Jim Mattis (at the time he was merely a retired general) said the U.S. should recognize Iran not as a nation-state but “a revolutionary cause devoted to mayhem…”
Obama’s Joint Comprehensive Plan of Action did not slow Iran’s military build-up — so it wasn’t very comprehensive.

 
    Posted at 2:59 pm by Austin Bay
 
   





SPACE:  Japanese company preparing for country’s first private rocket launch.

 
    Posted at 2:30 pm by Glenn Reynolds
 
   





I NOTICE IT’S ALWAYS WOMEN IN THESE SORTS OF ARTICLES.  WHY?  ‘Yes, I Have Herpes—And No, It Didn’t Ruin My Love Life.’

 
    Posted at 2:00 pm by Glenn Reynolds
 
   





ANNALS OF SEXIST GENERALIZATIONS:  “We recognize an unfortunate truth—that many of the young bros running today’s most successful tech startups are arrogant boors.”

 
    Posted at 1:30 pm by Glenn Reynolds
 
   





I KNOW SOME PEOPLE WHO ARE GOING TO LIVE FOREVER:  Being Neurotic Might Help You Live Longer.

 
    Posted at 1:00 pm by Glenn Reynolds
 
   





AT AMAZON, Fitbit Charge 2 Heart Rate + Fitness Wristband.

 
    Posted at 12:49 pm by Helen Smith
 
   





ROGER SIMON: Imran Awan Case Needs Special Counsel 100X More than Russiagate.

 
    Posted at 12:38 pm by Ed Driscoll
 
   





“WELCOME TO THE TEA PARTY, DEBRA MESSING!” Republican Wants To Raise Taxes, Democrat Freaks Out.
Psst, attention Steve Bannon: Repeal the Hollywood tax cuts, if you want to really stick it to the lefties in Hollywood.

 
    Posted at 12:35 pm by Ed Driscoll
 
   





LIFE AMONG THE RULING CLASS:  Harvard Magazine Personal Advertisements’ Many Synonyms For “Rich” or “Thin.”

 
    Posted at 12:30 pm by Glenn Reynolds
 
   





TRUMP’S SECRET WEAPON: THAT ELITES HAVE PROVEN THEMSELVES NOT SO ELITE, AND EXPERTS NOT SO EXPERT. Trump’s war against elites and expertise. The insane, foaming-at-the-mouth response to his election from the “elite, expert” class is itself refutation of the idea that these are the people with better judgment.

 
    Posted at 12:29 pm by Glenn Reynolds
 
   





WELL, THIS IS THE 21st CENTURY, YOU KNOW: Now Science Knows Just How Much Pee Is in a Public Pool.
But can science instantly determine that it’s just a Baby Ruth bar tossed into the pool at the Bushwood Country Club to keep the bathers calm?

 
    Posted at 12:14 pm by Ed Driscoll
 
   





IN THE MAIL:  From Encounter Books,  Uber-Positive: Why Americans Love the Sharing Economy,  and  How Progressive Cities Fight Innovation,    and also,  Unlocking Precision Medicine. 
Plus, fresh Gold Box and Lightning Deals.  Updated hourly!

 
    Posted at 11:00 am by Helen Smith
 
   





MIAMI HERALD:  Wasserman Schultz kept paying tech expert suspected of stealing House computers.

When a computer expert who worked for congressional Democrats was accused of stealing computers and data systems in February, members of Congress cut him loose within days, leaving Imran Awan with no supporters five months later.
Except for Rep. Debbie Wasserman Schultz.
The Weston Democrat has not explained in detail why she continued to employ Awan until Tuesday when she fired him — after he was arrested on bank-fraud charges at Dulles International Airport in Virginia attempting to board a flight to Pakistan.
And she has not elaborated on what work Awan did for her after he lost access to the House computer network.
She declined to answer questions about Awan in Washington on Wednesday, and her spokesman, David Damron, accompanied her to the House floor while instructing a reporter that Wasserman Schultz would not take questions about her former employee.
Background:  Wasserman Schultz aide arrested trying to leave the country.  “A senior House Democratic aide confirmed Awan was still employed by Rep. Debbie Wasserman Schultz (D-Fla.) as of Tuesday morning. But David Damron, a spokesman for Wasserman Schultz, later said that Awan was fired on Tuesday.”  Why was he still on the payroll?
Related:  Debbie Wasserman Schultz Tries to Distance from Staffer Who Took $100k from Iraqi Politician.
Flashback:  House IT Aides Fear Suspects In Hill Breach Are Blackmailing Members With Their Own Data.

Congressional technology aides are baffled that data-theft allegations against four former House IT workers — who were banned from the congressional network — have largely been ignored, and they fear the integrity of sensitive high-level information.
Imran Awan and three relatives were colleagues until police banned them from computer networks at the House of Representatives after suspicion the brothers accessed congressional computers without permission.
Five Capitol Hill technology aides told The Daily Caller News Foundation’s Investigative Group that members of Congress have displayed an inexplicable and intense loyalty towards the suspects who police say victimized them. The baffled aides wonder if the suspects are blackmailing representatives based on the contents of their emails and files, to which they had full access.
“I don’t know what they have, but they have something on someone. It’s been months at this point” with no arrests, said Pat Sowers, who has managed IT for several House offices for 12 years. “Something is rotten in Denmark.”
A manager at a tech-services company that works with Democratic House offices said he approached congressional offices, offering their services at one-fourth the price of Awan and his Pakistani brothers, but the members declined. At the time, he couldn’t understand why his offers were rejected but now he suspects the Awans exerted some type of leverage over members.
“There’s no question about it: If I was accused of a tenth of what these guys are accused of, they’d take me out in handcuffs that same day, and I’d never work again,” he said.
This stinks.
Another flashback:  Wasserman Schultz Threatened Capitol Police Chief For Gathering Evidence On Her IT Staffer’s Alleged Crimes.

 
    Posted at 10:59 am by Glenn Reynolds
 
   





GOOD THING WE DIDN’T MAKE SOME SORT OF DEAL WITH THEM A FEW YEARS AGO THAT WOULD MAKE IT EASIER TO GET NUCLEAR WEAPONS. . . . Uh oh.


 
    Posted at 10:58 am by Glenn Reynolds
 
   





I WAS HOPING FOR MORE THAN “I HAVE A PEN AND A PHONE,” BUT WITH THE GOP CONGRESS MAYBE I EXPECTED TOO MUCH:  The Myth of Trump’s Do-Nothing Presidency:  To gauge impact, go beyond the laws he has signed to the vast authority he wields through departments and agencies that apply the law.
Six months into his presidency, Donald Trump’s detractors portray him as a do-nothing president with no big wins on issues such as health care, taxes and infrastructure.
That may be true if the benchmark is legislation, but that is an incomplete benchmark. To gauge a president’s impact you have to go beyond the laws he signs to the vast authority he wields through departments and agencies that apply the law. On that score, Mr. Trump is on track to do a lot. On finance, the internet, immigration and drugs, to name just a few issues, Trump appointees have begun nudging the economy and the country in a more conservative, pro-business direction. Whether that is good or bad is to a great extent in the eye of the beholder. What isn’t debatable is that the imperial presidency, after expanding under Barack Obama, remains just as formidable under Mr. Trump.
In recent weeks headlines have been dominated by the Senate’s stop-start efforts to repeal and replace the Affordable Care Act. Away from this drama, Mr. Trump’s Labor Department moved to undo Mr. Obama’s expansion of eligibility for overtime pay, financial regulators dropped efforts to tighten restrictions on banker pay and the Interior Department signaled it would rescind proposed rules on oil and gas fracking on federal land. On Wednesday, Mr. Trump announced transgender individuals couldn’t serve in the military, reversing an Obama-era decision. 
In Mr. Trump’s first six months, rule-making has changed dramatically. The latest update on regulatory actions released last week by the White House Office of Management and Budget contained 1,731 preliminary, proposed or final rules, down 40% from its peak under Mr. Obama in 2011 and a 17-year low, according to Sofie Miller of George Washington University’s Regulatory Studies Center. Many actions taken under Mr. Trump are actually reversals of earlier rules. Ms. Miller says of 66 completed actions at the Environmental Protection Agency, a third were rule withdrawals.
You take what you can get.

 
    Posted at 10:58 am by Glenn Reynolds
 
   





FOR IRAN, SPEEDBOAT BLUFF IN THE PERSIAN GULF IS ASYMMETRIC WARFARE WAGED AGAINST THE GREAT SATAN, AMERICA: The ayatollahs will continue to employ terror and crime until they obtain The Great Equalizers: nuclear weapons and ICBMs that can target Washington, Tel Aviv, Paris, etcetera.

 
    Posted at 10:57 am by Austin Bay
 
   





THE 21st CENTURY ISN’T WORKING OUT THE WAY I HAD HOPED: Planned Parenthood Targets Toddlers for Talks on Transgenderism, Masturbation.

 
    Posted at 10:44 am by Ed Driscoll
 
   





I REMEMBER WHEN PRESIDENT OBAMA MOCKED SARAH PALIN BY SAYING WE COULDN’T “DRILL OUR WAY OUT OF” OUR ENERGY PROBLEMS:
2017 has already been a banner year for American oil production. U.S. shale producers have gotten their feet underneath them once again, adapting to the low oil price environment by cutting costs and improving efficiencies en route to turning a profit at $50 crude, and we’ve seen output surge accordingly. Since last October, U.S. oil production has increased more than 900,000 barrels per day, but according to the Energy Information Administration (EIA), the party’s just getting started—it expects American producers to break a 47 year old record for production in 2018. . . .
The United States is already the world’s biggest producer of oil and gas, thanks to a recent surge in production of hydrocarbons trapped in shale. Fracking has catapulted the U.S. to the front of the energy producing pack, so to speak, and now it’s going to hurtle us past another important milestone, into uncharted territory.
Policymakers and the public are both still playing catch-up to this extraordinary transformation. For decades, the U.S. energy debate was framed in terms of scarcity, as the legacy of the Arab oil embargo of the 1970s loomed large in American minds. We’ve moved far, far beyond that, as next year’s projected milestone shows, into a new era of energy abundance.
And just as we once transitioned from a discussion of achieving energy “independence” (a farcical idea) to shoring up energy “security,” we might now shift again to discussing how to achieve American energy “dominance,” as the Trump Administration has described it.
Yes, please.

 
    Posted at 10:30 am by Glenn Reynolds
 
   





OBAMA’S VERY BAD DEAL WITH IRAN: It didn’t stop an arms race, it ignited one.

 
    Posted at 10:19 am by Austin Bay
 
   





THE COLLATERAL COSTS OF diversity in legal education.

 
    Posted at 10:11 am by Glenn Reynolds
 
   





USA TODAY: Trump’s military transgender ban is unfair but correct.
An observation:  The ObamaCare repeal effort suffered a humiliating defeat, but all the press can talk about is Trump reinstating the transgender military ban.  And that’s something that polls well with Trump’s base, and lots of other people.  So who’s the stupid one?

 
    Posted at 10:05 am by Glenn Reynolds
 
   





IT’S SAFER THAN CHASING DOWN ISLAMIST ACID-ATTACKERS:  British Police Force to ‘Consider’ Charging People Who Mocked Promise to Track Down Trolls.

 
    Posted at 10:00 am by Glenn Reynolds
 
   





AT AMAZON, fresh New Releases, updated hourly.
Plus, today’s new Kindle Daily Deals.
And shop the Digital Deals of the Day.

 
    Posted at 9:00 am by Helen Smith
 
   





HARRIER AT SUNSET: Yes, the AV-8B Harrier is still around. It hasn’t quite faded into the sunset. (Nice photo.)

 
    Posted at 8:57 am by Austin Bay
 
   





ED MORRISSEY ON HOW Trump Needs To Follow Through On His Promise Of Increased Antitrust Enforcement.

 
    Posted at 8:48 am by Glenn Reynolds
 
   





THIS IS A SAFE SPACE. NO JEWS ALLOWED: Why are some American progressives embracing overt anti-Semitism?
On July 13, the Dyke March provided further proof that its intersectionality functioned as a flimsy pretense for anti-Semitism. A tweet from the group’s Twitter account used the term “Zio,” an anti-Jewish slur popularized by David Duke and his neo-Nazi followers. The Dyke March later sent another tweet apologizing for the insult—and adding, “We meant Zionist/white tears replenish our electrolytes.” Indeed, the group’s bizarre fixation on Jews frequently manifests itself as alt-right–style trolling. This is a mockery of intersectionality, not a defense of it.
For a primer on the leftwing conspiracy theory that is “intersectionality,” Christina Hoff Sommers has you covered:
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=cYpELqKZ02Q&feature=youtu.be
Incidentally, I tracked down Sommers’ video in the Insta-archives, when I linked last September to a Washington Post story titled, “In the safe spaces on campus, no Jews allowed.”
I’m sensing the aura of a penumbra of an emanation of a pattern here, based on the remarkably similar headlines. Why are Democrat monopoly institutions such cesspits of anti-Semitism?

 
    Posted at 8:44 am by Ed Driscoll
 
   





THE 36TH INFANTRY DIVISION’S 100TH ANNIVERSARY: I meant to link to this a few days ago. The 100th anniversary was July 18. In the 1930s my grandfather commanded the division’s 131st Field Artillery Regiment.

 
    Posted at 8:43 am by Austin Bay
 
   





LIVING WITH A NUCLEAR-ARMED NORTH KOREA?: Admiral Scott Swift, Commander of the Pacific Fleet, discussed options with The Sydney Morning Herald.
Asked to clarify whether that meant the world might have to live with a nuclear North Korea that could strike other continents, Admiral Swift said: “It’s not for me to say. It’s part of the dialogue is what I’m acknowledging. When people say, ‘everything is on the table,’ in my mind I think it includes a dialogue with respect to North Korea as a nuclear power. I don’t know if that’s acceptable. I’m not part of those discussions. But I know that’s part of the dialogue because people are reporting on it.”
Asked for his response to the fact that the stated US position is that it cannot tolerate a nuclear North Korea, Admiral Swift said: “I’m not a policy-maker. That may very well be the policy that the United States arrives at. But that now becomes the starting point for the dialogue.”
He said that military intervention was also part of the dialogue.
MORE:
He said that no simple solution was going to emerge and this was going to be a complicated and long-term process.
Here are some other course of action options for dealing with North Korea’s nuclear quest. They aren’t good, they aren’t simple.

 
    Posted at 8:36 am by Austin Bay
 
   





WEIRD, FROM WHAT I’VE SEEN IN THE PRESS AND ON SOCIAL MEDIA, ABSOLUTELY NOBODY EXCEPT A FEW NEANDERTHALS AGREES WITH TRUMP:  Only 23% Favor Transgenders In Military.

A poll conducted less than one month prior to President Trump’s decision on Wednesday to reverse an Obama-era policy that allowed transgender individuals to serve openly in the military found more people opposed than supported it.
Rasmussen surveyed 1,000 likely voters on the topic in late June, almost exactly one year after then-Defense Secretary Ash Carter announced the shift last summer.
“The U.S. Department of Defense now allows transgender people, those who identify with and want to live as the opposite sex, to serve openly in the military,” the survey said. “Is this decision good for the military, bad for the military or does it have no impact?”
Only 23 percent of people surveyed responded that it was good, while 31 percent said it was bad. The largest bloc of respondents, 38 percent, said it has no impact.
As the Washington Examiner reported earlier today, a Military Times poll conducted last December found 41 percent of active-duty troops believed the policy hurt military readiness, while only 12 percent said it helped.
Who knew?

 
    Posted at 8:30 am by Glenn Reynolds
 
   





CHANGES IN CIA MANAGEMENT POLICY?: According to the Washington Free Beacon, new CIA Director Mike Pompeo is giving more power to field agents and less to the bureaucrats.
Sounds like a good decision — but stay tuned.

 
    Posted at 8:23 am by Austin Bay
 
   





UNDERSTANDING THE AWAN CONNECTION.

 
    Posted at 8:14 am by Ed Driscoll
 
   





FIGHTING FOR FREEDOM:  Students will defend due process of their accused peers in new national program.
With growing concerns about due process on college campuses, a civil-liberties group is rolling out a new program intended to help students advocate for each other in campus judicial proceedings.
The Foundation for Individual Rights in Education plans to start 10 campus organizations this fall under the banner “FIRE Student Defenders,” FIRE Student Network Director Molly Nocheck told The College Fix in a phone interview.
Good.

 
    Posted at 8:00 am by Glenn Reynolds
 
   





JOURNALISM IS ABOUT COVERING IMPORTANT STORIES. WITH A PILLOW, UNTIL THEY STOP MOVING: Total CNN and MSNBC Blackout of Arrest of IT Guy Continues; Print Media Mentions the Story — with Hilarious Understatement.
Just think of the media as Democrat operatives with lavalieres, and it all makes sense.
(Classical reference in headline.)

 
    Posted at 7:44 am by Ed Driscoll
 
   





HIGHER EDUCATION BUBBLE UPDATE:  University to spend full week promoting ‘resistance’ to Trump policies.

 
    Posted at 7:30 am by Glenn Reynolds
 
   





MICHELLE MALKIN IS “LOOKING AT YOU, AMERICA-BASHING CORRUPTOCRATS IN MEXICO:” Who Owns the Border-Death Truck Tragedy?

 
    Posted at 7:14 am by Ed Driscoll
 
   





HIGHER EDUCATION BUBBLE UPDATE:  Historically Black College Offers $25,000 Scholarships for ‘Self-Identified LGBTQ Advocates.’

 
    Posted at 7:00 am by Glenn Reynolds
 
   





YEAH, IN GENERAL, EXCEPT FOR SOME DISGUSTING INTERLUDES: Does History Move Upward?

 
    Posted at 5:05 am by Sarah Hoyt
 
   





ABOUT TIME SOMEONE DID: Indie Goes Where Hollywood Fears to Thread.

 
    Posted at 4:30 am by Sarah Hoyt
 
   





SOME GOOD NEWS:Scalise released from hospital .

 
    Posted at 4:02 am by Sarah Hoyt
 
   





LAYERS AND LAYERS OF FACT CHECKERS: Today Show Published An Eclipse Map That Skips Over Idaho. Wait, What?!

 
    Posted at 4:00 am by Sarah Hoyt
 
   





ME? I WANT OUTLOOK BACK.  IT SERVED MY SIMPLE NEEDS:MS Paint Is Dead — Errr, Wait A Minute.

 
    Posted at 3:30 am by Sarah Hoyt
 
   





IT’S A CANADIAN PLOT! Axe throwing is now one of the hottest competitive sports.

 
    Posted at 3:00 am by Sarah Hoyt
 
   





DOES THIS MEAN I GET TO BUY MORE AMMO? Solar Eclipse Day Craziness Could Resemble the Zombie Apocalypse — Are You Ready?

 
    Posted at 2:30 am by Sarah Hoyt
 
   





DO YOU MEAN OTHER THAN HIGH TAXES, EXCESSIVE REGULATIONS AND PERVASIVE SMIRKING LEFTISM? Why people are getting the hell out of the Northeast.

 
    Posted at 2:00 am by Sarah Hoyt
 
   





AMANDA GREEN HAS SOME:Questions for Readers.

 
    Posted at 1:30 am by Sarah Hoyt
 
   





SERVING IN THE MILITARY IS NOT A RIGHT: Trans and the Military.

 
    Posted at 1:00 am by Sarah Hoyt
 
   




July 26, 2017



SAME HERE: I left New York City so I could feel hotter.

 
    Posted at 11:44 pm by Ed Driscoll
 
   





THE 21st CENTURY ISN’T WORKING OUT THE WAY I HAD HOPED: Feminists Shout ‘VAGINA!’ in Public for Planned Parenthood. WTF?
Don’t try this at home, kids: “I took the challenge at church during prayers. You should have been clear this was just for women. Please send bail money.”
Heh, indeed. Read the whole thing.™

 
    Posted at 10:55 pm by Ed Driscoll
 
   





GOOD, BECAUSE I DON’T WANT TO BE SHREDDED:  Lean Is Easy. Shredded Is Hard.

 
    Posted at 10:18 pm by Glenn Reynolds
 
   





ANALYSIS:  TRUE.  De Blasio and company aren’t just bad liars — they’re dumb too.

Read my lips: I don’t care. It’s an irrelevancy,” Mayor de Blasio declared yesterday.
Well, that’s a little cold.
De Blasio is back in the deep weeds, his minions having booted vagrants from a couple of Brooklyn subway stations so the bums wouldn’t spoil a weekend campaign photo-op.
And getting caught at it.
And then lying about it.
And then getting caught in the lie, which clearly has made the mayor a tad peevish. This is understandable, because the episode exposes him as a man who can’t even stage a four-subway-stop publicity stunt — even as he runs for a second term as chief executive of the world’s greatest city.
(God surely must love New York, given the people it manages to survive.)
Indeed.

 
    Posted at 9:43 pm by Glenn Reynolds
 
   





AT AMAZON, Hausbell 7W Ultra Bright Mini LED Flashlight Tactical Flashlight (2 Pack).

 
    Posted at 9:37 pm by Helen Smith
 
   





I LIKE THIS:  Concealed Carry Wednesday:  Show Us Your CCW Card And Get 25% Off.  “You pack the heat, we cook the meat.”  That’s even better than this story.

 
    Posted at 9:04 pm by Glenn Reynolds
 
   





WHY I’M LEAVING UK ACADEMIA:  “To put it simply we have in recent times witnessed an administrative coup in UK academia.”
It’s that way here, too.  And it hasn’t made things better.

 
    Posted at 8:02 pm by Glenn Reynolds
 
   





AT AMAZON, Shop The Amazon Outlet Store – Clearance, Markdowns and Overstock Deals.
Plus, Shop Amazon Warehouse Deals – Deep Discounts on Open-box and Used Sports Equipment.

 
    Posted at 7:00 pm by Helen Smith
 
   





WHAT COULD GO WRONG? Scientists dim sunlight, suck up carbon dioxide to cool planet, Reuters reports today:
Scientists are sucking carbon dioxide from the air with giant fans and preparing to release chemicals from a balloon to dim the sun’s rays as part of a climate engineering push to cool the planet.
Backers say the risky, often expensive projects are urgently needed to find ways of meeting the goals of the Paris climate deal to curb global warming that researchers blame for causing more heatwaves, downpours and rising sea levels.
* * * * * * *
Keith’s team aims to release about 1 kilo (2.2 lbs) of sun dimming material, perhaps calcium carbonate, from a high-altitude balloon above Arizona next year in a tiny experiment to see how it affects the microphysics of the stratosphere.
This was something that John Holdren, Obama’s “Science” “Czar,” who in the 1970s, had a serious dalliance with radical eugenics, proposed in early 2009. Why couldn’t he convince the Obama administration to take him up on his risky environmental scheme, during a period when Democrats had control of all three branches of the federal government, and when James Hansen, NASA’s (since-retired) global warming guru was saying that Obama only had four years to save the earth?


 
    Posted at 6:59 pm by Ed Driscoll
 
   





FASTER PLEASE:  New gene editing screens thousands of genes at once for cancer and will scale to whole genome screening.

 
    Posted at 6:04 pm by Glenn Reynolds
 
   





COOL NEWS: Discovering a sixth century parchment in the binding of a sixteenth century book.

 
    Posted at 5:22 pm by Austin Bay
 
   




← Earlier Posts






 



 














 Search Instapundit



 
 
 

 



 

 




 
 

 



 


Link to Instapundit
Archives
Recommended

Six: The Movie
Becker-Posner Blog
BlackProf
Books for Kids Blog
Cliopatria
Deceiver.com
Dr. Helen
InstaPundit Store!
My TCS Columns
Of Arms & the Law
PJ Media
Strategy Page
The Tatler
WiFi Net News


Big Journalism

ALDaily
Anchoress
Andrew Malcolm
Barone Blog
Best of the Web
Biased BBC
BlogCritics
Bluey Blog
Brain Terminal
Breitbart.com
Chris Anderson
Cox and Forkum
Daily Howler
Dan Gillmor
Dave Barry
David Corn
David Frum
Day By Day
DefenseTech
Don Surber
Drudge Report
Electrolite
Ernie the Attorney
Flit
Fraters Libertas
Gary Farber
Gateway Pundit
Gene Expression
Hit and Run
Howard Kurtz
Hugh Hewitt
Indian Country
Inside Higher Ed.
Jennifer Rubin
Jim Geraghty
Josh Marshall
Jules Crittenden
Jurist
JWR
Kausfiles
Kevin Drum
Larry Kudlow
Mark Steyn
Martin Peretz
MediaBistro
Michael Silence
Michelle Malkin
Neal Boortz
PoliticalWire
RealClearPolitics
Red State
Rich Galen
SciTech Daily
Scott Rosenberg
SlashDot
Slate.com
Tapped
TCS Daily
That Liberal Media
The Corner
The Note
TownHall.com
Virginia Postrel
Walter Shapiro


Pure Bloggers

Alphecca
Andrea See
Andrew Olmsted
Ann Althouse
Baldilocks
Baseball Crank
Bigwig
Bill Peschel
Bill Quick
Bill Whittle
BitchGirls
Bjorn Staerk
Blackfive
Blogosferics
Blogs of War
Brad DeLong
Brian Carnell
Brian Linse
Brothers Judd
Burchismo
Capt. Ed
Charles Austin
Charles Murtaugh
ChicagoBoyz
Clayton Cramer
Colby Cosh
Cold Fury
Cori Dauber
Correspondence Committee
Cranky Professor
Critical Mass
Crooked Timber
Damian Penny
Daniel Drezner
Dave Kopel
Dave Winer
David Pinto
Dean Esmay
Deinonychus
Denise Howell
Derek Lowe
Diana Hsieh
Discriminations
Doc Searls
Donald Luskin
Donald Sensing
DPM
Dr. Frank
Dr. Weevil
Ed Cone
Ed Driscoll
Edward Boyd
Eric Muller
Eric S. Raymond
Eve Tushnet
Fight Aging!
FuturePundit
Geek Press
Gut Rumbles
HaightSpeech
Heather Havrilesky
Howard Bashman
Howard Owens
Howard Veit
IMAO
InkWell
InstaLawyer
Iraq the Model
Jack Balkin
James Lileks
Jason Kottke
Jay Manifold
Jeff Goldstein
Jeff Jarvis
Jerry Pournelle
Jessica’s Well
Jim Henley
Jim Miller
Jim Treacher
Joanne Jacobs
John Cole
John Ellis
John Scalzi
John Weidner
Joshua Claybourn
Kate
Kathy Kinsley
Katie Granju
Kesher Talk
Kevin Holtsberry
Kitchen Cabinet
La Shawn Barber
Larry Lessig
Laurence Simon
Listen Missy
Lynne Kiesling
Mark Byron
Martin Devon
Master of None
Matt Welch
Matthew Hoy
MCJ
Megan McArdle
Meryl Yourish
Michael Totten
Mike Silverman
Milt Rosenberg
MinuteMan (Maguire)
Misha
Mitch Berg
Moira Breen
Mudville Gazette
N.Z. Bear
NanoDot
Natalie Solent
Nick Denton
No Watermelons
Obscure Store
Photon Courier
Power Line
Professor Bainbridge
Rabbit Blog
Rand Simberg
Rantburg
RealClearPolitics
Rebecca Blood
RedState
Reid Stott
Rich Hailey
Right Wing News
Robert Musil
Robin Roberts
Roger L. Simon
Samizdata
SCSU Scholars
Silent Running
Sissy Willis
Skippy
Spoons
Stefan Sharkansky
Stephen Green
Steven Den Beste
Stuart Buck
Suman Palit
TalkLeft
The Agitator
The Fat Guy
The Homeless Guy
The Volokh Conspiracy
Tim Blair
Ublog
Walter Olson
Will Warren
William Hobbs
Winds of Change
Yuppies of Zion
Zeyad





 



 



About
FAQ
Podcasts
Terms of Use

Powered by WordPress | Design by Sekimori | Instapundit & Instapundit.com Reg. U.S. Pat. & Tm. Off.
  | VIEW MOBILE SITE






 














 
 



















0684827646 - The Appearance of Impropriety: How the Ethics Wars Have Undermined American Government, Business, and Society by Peter W Morgan; Glenn Reynolds - AbeBooks













abebooks.com Passion for books.


Sign OnMy AccountBasket Help 












Search

By Keyword
By Title
By Author
By ISBN
By Publisher
By Collection


Find
Advanced Search


















              Item added to your basket
              

View basket




              Order Total (1 Item Items):
 
Shipping Destination: 


Proceed to Basket





 


View basket




Continue shopping





0684827646 - The Appearance of Impropriety: How the Ethics Wars Have Undermined American Government, Business, and Society by Peter W Morgan; Glenn Reynolds

You Searched For:

ISBN:
0684827646

Edit Your Search







Results (1 - 17) of 17







Sort By 

Author A-Z
Author Z-A
Bookseller Rating
Highest Price
Lowest Price
Lowest Total Price
Most Recently Listed
Relevance (Beta)
Title A-Z
Title Z-A
Year of Publication Ascending
Year of Publication Descending






Show results for
Product Type


All Product Types 


Books (17)


Magazines & Periodicals


Comics


Sheet Music


Art, Prints & Posters


Photographs


Maps


Manuscripts & Paper Collectibles



Refine by
Condition



All Conditions 


New Books (5)      


Used Books (12)      

Binding



All Bindings 

Hardcover


Softcover


Collectible Attributes



First Edition (2)      

Signed Copy



Dust Jacket (2)      

Seller-Supplied Images


Not Printed On Demand


Free Shipping



Free US Shipping (7)      

Bookseller Location


All Locations


Bookseller Rating



All Booksellers 

and up


and up



and up (15)      


  (6)      

 



Search Within These Results:


























            Stock Image
    








The Appearance of Impropriety : How the Ethics Wars Have Undermined America Government, Business and Society

Peter W. Morgan; Glenn H. Reynolds


              Published by
              Free Press


ISBN 10: 0684827646
ISBN 13: 9780684827643



Used
Hardcover

Quantity Available: 1

From: Second City Books (Aurora, IL, U.S.A.)
Bookseller Rating:









Price: US$ 4.52

Convert Currency
Shipping:
FREE

      Within U.S.A.
  
Destination, Rates & Speeds



Item Description: Free Press. Hardcover. Book Condition: Good. Book has some visible wear on the binding, cover, pages.  Bookseller Inventory # G0684827646I3N00

More Information About This Seller
              | Ask Bookseller a Question
1.

















            Stock Image
    








The Appearance of Impropriety : How the Ethics Wars Have Undermined America Government, Business and Society

Peter W. Morgan; Glenn H. Reynolds


              Published by
              Free Press


ISBN 10: 0684827646
ISBN 13: 9780684827643



Used
Hardcover

Quantity Available: 1

From: Atlanta Book Company (Atlanta, GA, U.S.A.)
Bookseller Rating:









Price: US$ 4.52

Convert Currency
Shipping:
FREE

      Within U.S.A.
  
Destination, Rates & Speeds



Item Description: Free Press. Hardcover. Book Condition: Very Good. Light wear to edges and pages. Cover and spine show no easily noticeable damage.  Bookseller Inventory # G0684827646I4N00

More Information About This Seller
              | Ask Bookseller a Question
2.

















            Stock Image
    








The Appearance of Impropriety: How the Ethics Wars Have Undermined American Government, Business, and Society

Morgan, Peter W.; Reynolds, Glenn


              Published by
              Free Press


ISBN 10: 0684827646
ISBN 13: 9780684827643



Used
Hardcover

Quantity Available: 1

From: Your Online Bookstore (Houston, TX, U.S.A.)
Bookseller Rating:









Price: US$ 5.27

Convert Currency
Shipping:
FREE

      Within U.S.A.
  
Destination, Rates & Speeds



Item Description: Free Press. Hardcover. Book Condition: Good. 0684827646 Ships promptly.  Bookseller Inventory # GBN8685SHGG061717H0245

More Information About This Seller
              | Ask Bookseller a Question
3.

















            Stock Image
    








The Appearance of Impropriety: How the Ethics Wars Have Undermined American Government, Business, and Society

Peter W. Morgan, Glenn Reynolds


              Published by
              Free Press


ISBN 10: 0684827646
ISBN 13: 9780684827643



Used
Hardcover

Quantity Available: 1

From: Free Shipping Books (Toledo, OH, U.S.A.)
Bookseller Rating:









Price: US$ 6.59

Convert Currency
Shipping:
FREE

      Within U.S.A.
  
Destination, Rates & Speeds



Item Description: Free Press. Hardcover. Book Condition: VERY GOOD. little to no wear, pages are clean. The cover and binding are crisp with next no creases.  Bookseller Inventory # 2782203303

More Information About This Seller
              | Ask Bookseller a Question
4.



















            Stock Image
    








Appearance of Impropriety: How the Ethics Wars Have Undermined American Government, Business, and Society

Morgan, Peter W.; Reynolds, Glenn H.


              Published by
              Free Press, Old Tappan, New Jersey, U.S.A.
(1997)


ISBN 10: 0684827646
ISBN 13: 9780684827643



Used
Hardcover
First Edition

Quantity Available: 1

From: Wayward Books (south dartmouth, MA, U.S.A.)
Bookseller Rating:









Price: US$ 14.99

Convert Currency
Shipping:
FREE

      Within U.S.A.
  
Destination, Rates & Speeds



Item Description: Free Press, Old Tappan, New Jersey, U.S.A., 1997. Hard Cover. Book Condition: Fine. Dust Jacket Condition: Fine. First Edition. Remainder mark on the bottom edge, one corner is bumped, otherwise like new. Remainder.  Bookseller Inventory # 009835

More Information About This Seller
              | Ask Bookseller a Question
5.


















            Stock Image
    








The Appearance of Impropriety: How the Ethics Wars Have Undermined American Government, Business, and Society

Peter W. Morgan; Glenn Reynolds


              Published by
              Free Press
(1997)


ISBN 10: 0684827646
ISBN 13: 9780684827643



Used
Hardcover

Quantity Available: 1

From: Ergodebooks (RICHMOND, TX, U.S.A.)
Bookseller Rating:









Price: US$ 11.74

Convert Currency
Shipping:
US$ 3.99

      Within U.S.A.
  
Destination, Rates & Speeds



Item Description: Free Press, 1997. Hardcover. Book Condition: Used: Good.  Bookseller Inventory # SONG0684827646

More Information About This Seller
              | Ask Bookseller a Question
6.


















            Stock Image
    








The Appearance of Impropriety: How the Ethics Wars Have Undermined American Government, Business, and Society

Morgan, Peter W.; Reynolds, Glenn


              Published by
              Free Press 1997-09-15
(1997)


ISBN 10: 0684827646
ISBN 13: 9780684827643



Used
Hardcover

Quantity Available: 1

From: M and N Media (Acworth, GA, U.S.A.)
Bookseller Rating:









Price: US$ 17.23

Convert Currency
Shipping:
US$ 3.99

      Within U.S.A.
  
Destination, Rates & Speeds



Item Description: Free Press 1997-09-15, 1997. Hardcover. Book Condition: Fair. 0684827646 We guarantee all of our items - customer service and satisfaction are our top priorities. Please allow 4 - 14 business days for Standard shipping, within the US.  Bookseller Inventory # POTM-0684827646

More Information About This Seller
              | Ask Bookseller a Question
7.



















            Stock Image
    








Appearance of Impropriety: How the Ethics Wars Have Undermined American Government, Business, and Society

Morgan, Peter W.; Reynolds, Glenn H.


              Published by
              Free Press, New York, NY
(1997)


ISBN 10: 0684827646
ISBN 13: 9780684827643



Used
Hardcover
First Edition

Quantity Available: 1

From: The Book House, Inc.  - St. Louis (St. Louis, MO, U.S.A.)
Bookseller Rating:









Price: US$ 16.00

Convert Currency
Shipping:
US$ 6.00

      Within U.S.A.
  
Destination, Rates & Speeds



Item Description: Free Press, New York, NY, 1997. Hardbound. Book Condition: Very Good. Dust Jacket Condition: Very Good. 1st Edition. VG with DJ Hardbound; 272 pp.; First Edition. First Edition.  Bookseller Inventory # 050603-P280

More Information About This Seller
              | Ask Bookseller a Question
8.
















            Stock Image
    








The Appearance of Impropriety: How the Ethics Wars Have Undermined American Government, Business, and Society

Peter W. Morgan, Glenn Reynolds


ISBN 10: 0684827646
ISBN 13: 9780684827643



Used
Hardcover

Quantity Available: 1

From: BookHolders (gambrills, MD, U.S.A.)
Bookseller Rating:









Price: US$ 18.23

Convert Currency
Shipping:
US$ 4.25

      Within U.S.A.
  
Destination, Rates & Speeds



Item Description: Book Condition: Good. [ No Hassle 30 Day Returns ][ Ships Daily ] [ Underlining/Highlighting: NONE ] [ Writing: NONE ] [ Edition: Reprint ] Publisher: Free Press Pub Date: 9/15/1997 Binding: Hardcover Pages: 288 Reprint edition.  Bookseller Inventory # 5649069

More Information About This Seller
              | Ask Bookseller a Question
9.


















            Stock Image
    








The Appearance of Impropriety: How the Ethics Wars Have Undermined American Government, Business, and Society

Morgan, Peter W.; Reynolds, Glenn


              Published by
              Free Press 1997-09-15
(1997)


ISBN 10: 0684827646
ISBN 13: 9780684827643



New
Hardcover

Quantity Available: 1

From: M and N Media (Acworth, GA, U.S.A.)
Bookseller Rating:









Price: US$ 21.16

Convert Currency
Shipping:
US$ 3.99

      Within U.S.A.
  
Destination, Rates & Speeds



Item Description: Free Press 1997-09-15, 1997. Hardcover. Book Condition: New. 0684827646 We guarantee all of our items - customer service and satisfaction are our top priorities. Please allow 4 - 14 business days for Standard shipping, within the US.  Bookseller Inventory # TM-0684827646

More Information About This Seller
              | Ask Bookseller a Question
10.


















            Stock Image
    








The Appearance of Impropriety: How the Ethics Wars Have Undermined American Government, Business, a

Peter W. Morgan, Glenn Reynolds


              Published by
              Free Press
(1997)


ISBN 10: 0684827646
ISBN 13: 9780684827643



Used
Hardcover

Quantity Available: 2

From: Murray Media (North Miami Beach, FL, U.S.A.)
Bookseller Rating:









Price: US$ 30.81

Convert Currency
Shipping:
US$ 2.99

      Within U.S.A.
  
Destination, Rates & Speeds



Item Description: Free Press, 1997. Hardcover. Book Condition: Very Good.  Bookseller Inventory # P020684827646

More Information About This Seller
              | Ask Bookseller a Question
11.


















            Stock Image
    








The Appearance of Impropriety: How the Ethics Wars Have Undermined American Government, Business, and Society

Peter W. Morgan; Glenn Reynolds


              Published by
              Free Press
(1997)


ISBN 10: 0684827646
ISBN 13: 9780684827643



New
Hardcover

Quantity Available: 1

From: Irish Booksellers (Rumford, ME, U.S.A.)
Bookseller Rating:









Price: US$ 33.94

Convert Currency
Shipping:
FREE

      Within U.S.A.
  
Destination, Rates & Speeds



Item Description: Free Press, 1997. Hardcover. Book Condition: New. book.  Bookseller Inventory # 0684827646

More Information About This Seller
              | Ask Bookseller a Question
12.


















            Stock Image
    








The Appearance of Impropriety: How the Ethics Wars Have Undermined American Government, Business, a

Peter W. Morgan, Glenn Reynolds


              Published by
              Free Press
(1997)


ISBN 10: 0684827646
ISBN 13: 9780684827643



New
Hardcover

Quantity Available: 2

From: Murray Media (North Miami Beach, FL, U.S.A.)
Bookseller Rating:









Price: US$ 39.48

Convert Currency
Shipping:
US$ 2.99

      Within U.S.A.
  
Destination, Rates & Speeds



Item Description: Free Press, 1997. Hardcover. Book Condition: New.  Bookseller Inventory # P110684827646

More Information About This Seller
              | Ask Bookseller a Question
13.

















            Stock Image
    








The Appearance of Impropriety: How the Ethics Wars Have Undermined American Government, Business, and Society

Morgan, Peter W.; Reynolds, Glenn


              Published by
              Free Press


ISBN 10: 0684827646
ISBN 13: 9780684827643



Used
Hardcover

Quantity Available: 1

From: Cloud 9 Books (Wellington, FL, U.S.A.)
Bookseller Rating:









Price: US$ 39.99

Convert Currency
Shipping:
US$ 4.99

      Within U.S.A.
  
Destination, Rates & Speeds



Item Description: Free Press. Hardcover. Book Condition: Fine. 0684827646 Like New Condition.  Bookseller Inventory # LN6.1232895

More Information About This Seller
              | Ask Bookseller a Question
14.

















            Stock Image
    








The Appearance of Impropriety: How the Ethics Wars Have Undermined American Government, Business, and Society

Morgan, Peter W.; Reynolds, Glenn


              Published by
              Free Press


ISBN 10: 0684827646
ISBN 13: 9780684827643



New
Hardcover

Quantity Available: 1

From: Cloud 9 Books (Wellington, FL, U.S.A.)
Bookseller Rating:









Price: US$ 59.99

Convert Currency
Shipping:
US$ 4.99

      Within U.S.A.
  
Destination, Rates & Speeds



Item Description: Free Press. Hardcover. Book Condition: New. 0684827646 New Condition.  Bookseller Inventory # NEW6.1232895

More Information About This Seller
              | Ask Bookseller a Question
15.


















            Stock Image
    








The Appearance of Impropriety: How the Ethics Wars Have Undermined American Government, Business, and Society

Peter W. Morgan, Glenn Reynolds


              Published by
              Free Press
(1997)


ISBN 10: 0684827646
ISBN 13: 9780684827643



New
Hardcover

Quantity Available: 1

From: Ergodebooks (RICHMOND, TX, U.S.A.)
Bookseller Rating:









Price: US$ 82.42

Convert Currency
Shipping:
US$ 3.99

      Within U.S.A.
  
Destination, Rates & Speeds



Item Description: Free Press, 1997. Hardcover. Book Condition: New.  Bookseller Inventory # DADAX0684827646

More Information About This Seller
              | Ask Bookseller a Question
16.


















            Stock Image
    








The Appearance of Impropriety: How the Ethics Wars Have Undermined American Government, Business, and Society

Peter W. Morgan


              Published by
              Free Press
(1997)


ISBN 10: 0684827646
ISBN 13: 9780684827643



Used
Hardcover

Quantity Available: 1

From: Books Express (Portsmouth, NH, U.S.A.)
Bookseller Rating:









Price: US$ 89.59

Convert Currency
Shipping:
FREE

      Within U.S.A.
  
Destination, Rates & Speeds



Item Description: Free Press, 1997. Hardcover. Book Condition: Good. Ships with Tracking Number! INTERNATIONAL WORLDWIDE Shipping available. May not contain Access Codes or Supplements. Buy with confidence, excellent customer service!.  Bookseller Inventory # 0684827646

More Information About This Seller
              | Ask Bookseller a Question
17.



 
 


Results (1 - 17) of 17







Sort By 

Author A-Z
Author Z-A
Bookseller Rating
Highest Price
Lowest Price
Lowest Total Price
Most Recently Listed
Relevance (Beta)
Title A-Z
Title Z-A
Year of Publication Ascending
Year of Publication Descending







Create a Want
Tell us what you're looking for and once a match is found, we'll inform you by e-mail.
Create a Want


BookSleuth
Can't remember the title or the author of a book? Our BookSleuth is specially designed for you.
Visit BookSleuth


Help with Search
Search Tips 
Glossary of Terms 
Set your own Search Preferences





Mobile View:
 Available
Not Available
×
































Glenn P Reynolds | Blacksburg VA | Read Reviews + Get a Bid | BuildZoom


































































×





Want a quote from
Glenn P Reynolds?


We recommend getting 3 quotes
for any construction project. 
Use our
free bidding system
to get a quote from Glenn P Reynolds
+ 2 more of the best.



Tell us about your project









Is this your business? Claim now >






G







BZ Score:
90







License # RA013954B




Blacksburg, VA









Glenn P Reynolds




this is my business



Contact us






BZ Score:
90







WRITE A REVIEW















Summary

this is my business
request a quote















Home

 
/


Search

 
/


 best Architects in Blacksburg 

 



Updated: Jan 21, 2016





Overview

Glenn P Reynolds in Blacksburg, VA holds a Architects, Registered Architect  license (RA013954B) according to the Pennsylvania license board. Their BuildZoom score of 90 indicates that they are licensed or registered but we do not have additional information about them.BuildZoom has not verified this license since its expiration date. If you are thinking of hiring Glenn P Reynolds, we recommend double-checking their license status with the license board and using our bidding system to get competitive quotes. 




Where Glenn P Reynolds Works


Google





Project Types Offered



Architectural Drawings and ...
Other Architecture and Engi...






Contact


Do you work for this business?
Unlock this free profile
to update company info and see who's viewing your profile.






Similar Contractors
See more









4983 Blue Sky Lane, Dublin, VA 24084


Community Construction & Designs Inc




License # 2705055759


Dublin, VA







91

BZ Score


-
Avg Project 


-
Projects














32 7th Street N E, Pulaski, VA 24301


Sound Designs




License # 2705079886


Pulaski, VA







90

BZ Score


-
Avg Project 


-
Projects














6525 Commonwealth Drive, Roanoke, VA 24018


Architectural Wood




License # 2705026009


Roanoke, VA







91

BZ Score


-
Avg Project 


-
Projects













Glenn P Reynolds Reviews



BuildZoom hasn't received any reviews for Glenn P Reynolds. Click here to be alerted when reviews are posted about them.



Please write a review about Glenn P Reynolds










1
Rate this architect







Click stars to rate




2
Provide a detailed review of this architect.






 














Recent Buildzoom Projects


View all








Custom Home Build










Restaurant Buildout










Swimming Pool Project










Kitchen Remodel










Bathroom Remodel








Request a Quote





Explore BuildZoom

If you are considering hiring Glenn P Reynolds,
we recommend double-checking their license status with the license board
and using our
bidding system
to get competitive quotes.




Hiring a contractor?






Get bids from BuildZoom's best contractors within 5 mins during regular business hours by filling out this form




I need help with...





Zip Code





Request Quotes From





90


Glenn P Reynolds








91


Community Construction & Designs Inc







90


Sound Designs







91


Architectural Wood






Request a Quote







License info














License Not Verified


License #RA013954BStatusActiveStatePennsylvaniaTypeArchitects, Registered Architect


When BuildZoom last verified this license, it had an expiration date of June, 2015. Check the current license status of Glenn P Reynolds with the Pennsylvania Department of State (Bureau of Professional and Occupational Affairs)












90




BuildZoom Score


How the BuildZoom Score works








Follow this contractor








Employees







Glenn P Reynolds
Owner


















Before you Hire

Here are some rules, regulations, and laws governing general contractors
in Pennsylvania:













Does Glenn P Reynolds carry a valid contracting license?



Pennsylvania does not have any licensure or certification requirements for most construction contractors. However, on July 1, 2009, the Home Improvement Consumer Protection Act (Senate Bill 100) took effect. This law requires most home improvement contractors to register with the Pennsylvania Attorney General’s Office. 
Glenn P Reynolds currently holds license RA013954B (Architects, Registered Architect), which was Active when we last checked. 











How important is contractor licensing in Pennsylvania?



Contractors in Pennsylvania do not have to take an exam prior to registering as home improvement contractors. 











Your liability risk when hiring Glenn P Reynolds



Registered home improvement contractors in Pennsylvania must show proof of general liability insurance, workers' compensation insurance is not required. It is a good idea to only hire contractors with current general liability and workers' compensation policies. Be sure to request copies of insurance certificates for each before any work begins. 











What else should I know before hiring Glenn P Reynolds



Pennsylvania has some of the lightest regulations on home improvement contractors in the US and there is no financial or criminal background check performed on contractors by the State. The Pennsylvania State Police maintain a publicly accessible database so consumers can run their own background check before making a hire if they are so inclined. 











How is the BuildZoom score calculated?



The BuildZoom score is based on a number of factors including the contractor's license status, insurance status, verified work history, standing with local consumer interest groups, verified reviews from other BuildZoom users and self-reported feedback from the contractor.











Why you should hire through BuildZoom



When it comes to major construction work or even minor alterations to your home, hiring the wrong contractor could result in incomplete or defective work. You may even find yourself dealing with huge liability claims. BuildZoom does the homework for you and helps you hire the right contractor.











You should get several bids before hiring a contractor



Before hiring a contractor in Pennsylvania, be sure to get at least 3 detailed bids. Quality contractors will take the time to explain their budget proposal, and help guide you through the estimate process. Be wary of an abnormally low bid, they are not worth the risk. These underpriced projects often do not end well for the homeowner, choose a contractor you trust and can clearly communicate with. BuildZoom has made the bid collection process extremely simple (and free). Just click here to get started.









About BuildZoom






BuildZoom has one simple purpose: To help you find the perfect contractor
for any job, commercial or residential.


BuildZoom is a database of every licensed contractor in the United States.
We work hard to figure out who the great contractors are, and who the bad
contractors are.

more...





BuildZoom combines license information on 3.5 million contractors with
110 million building permits, and over 80,000
reviews from property owners.If you are looking for a specific
contractor and you can’t find them on BuildZoom, it’s likely that they do
not have a license - please
contact us
and we’ll try to help!



Finding a Contractor through BuildZoom



The best way to use BuildZoom is to let us recommend contractors for
your remodeling projects.


Homeowners who

hire through BuildZoom's free bidding system
 report high rates of satisfaction, and homeowners who research
contractors online are twice as likely to be happy at the end of their
project.


If you hire a contractor through BuildZoom, that contractor is
accountable to us. We can enforce standards of behavior, mediate
disputes, and guarantee satisfaction.



Read more about why hiring through BuildZoom is so effective.
 
less...









Press Coverage





BuildZoom’s database now contains every licensed contractor across the U.S. - over 2.5 million of them... Categorized contractor profiles are enriched using government data from state licensing boards, Better Business Bureau ratings, and more…


BuildZoom jumped into the fray by announcing that it raised $10.6 million in a round led by Formation 8. ...the Y combinator-backed startup said it will be focused on remodeling projects, where the median budget is around $19,000…


A new index compiled by BuildZoom — which identifies contractors for projects — found that renovations are
running 2.8 percent above their 2005 level…




















×
Contact Glenn P Reynolds
We will attempt to deliver your message to Glenn P Reynolds. We'll notify you when it is delivered.













Your Name

Your Email

Your Phone (optional)

Your Message

I'm interested in speaking with you about a project. Are you available to chat today?

 









‹
›
×




×












 
How the BuildZoom Score Works
Read more about the BuildZoom scoring algorithm here.


A Licensed Contractor Starts with 90 Points.


Their score will increase or decrease based on these variables.
























Positive Client Feedback





Verified License + Insurance





Project History





Community Participation





Profile Page Content


Employee Info
Years in Business
Contact Info
Project Photos









Suspended or Inactive License





Negative Client Feedback





Limited Work History
























Browse remodeling photos
If you are looking for remodeling ideas, you can browse hundreds of beautiful photos of work performed by our general contractors.






Browse building permits
You can use our building permit search to see the contractors who are active in your neighborhood and the projects currently taking place.






Get a cost estimate
Use our remodeling calculator to get a ballpark estimate for your project. If you're ready to hire, use our bidding system to get actual quotes from local contractors.






























































